tables/no-no-g3.ctb
endword sam 25-146
endword samt 25-146-2345
endword samar 25-146-3456
endword samars 25-146-3456-234
endword samen 25-146-126
endword samens 25-146-126-234
endword samer 25-146-156
endword samers 25-146-156-234
endword samet 25-146-346
endword samets 25-146-346-234
endword samne 25-146-2346
endword samnes 25-146-2346-234
endword samte 25-146-1256
endword samtes 25-146-1256-234
endword samre 25-146-12356
endword samres 25-146-12356-234
endword same 26-146
endword samene 26-146-2346
endword samenes 26-146-2346-234
endword samere 26-146-12356
endword sameres 26-146-12356-234
endword sames 26-146-234
endword arsam 3456-25-146
endword arsamt 3456-25-146-2345
endword arsamar 3456-25-146-3456
endword arsamars 3456-25-146-3456-234
endword arsamen 3456-25-146-126
endword arsamens 3456-25-146-126-234
endword arsamer 3456-25-146-156
endword arsamers 3456-25-146-156-234
endword arsamet 3456-25-146-346
endword arsamets 3456-25-146-346-234
endword arsamne 3456-25-146-2346
endword arsamnes 3456-25-146-2346-234
endword arsamte 3456-25-146-1256
endword arsamtes 3456-25-146-1256-234
endword arsamre 3456-25-146-12356
endword arsamres 3456-25-146-12356-234
endword arsame 3456-26-146
endword arsamene 3456-26-146-2346
endword arsamenes 3456-26-146-2346-234
endword arsamere 3456-26-146-12356
endword arsameres 3456-26-146-12356-234
endword arsames 3456-26-146-234
endword bruksam 12-13-25-146
endword bruksamt 12-13-25-146-2345
endword bruksamar 12-13-25-146-3456
endword bruksamars 12-13-25-146-3456-234
endword bruksamen 12-13-25-146-126
endword bruksamens 12-13-25-146-126-234
endword bruksamer 12-13-25-146-156
endword bruksamers 12-13-25-146-156-234
endword bruksamet 12-13-25-146-346
endword bruksamets 12-13-25-146-346-234
endword bruksamne 12-13-25-146-2346
endword bruksamnes 12-13-25-146-2346-234
endword bruksamte 12-13-25-146-1256
endword bruksamtes 12-13-25-146-1256-234
endword bruksamre 12-13-25-146-12356
endword bruksamres 12-13-25-146-12356-234
endword bruksame 12-13-26-146
endword bruksamene 12-13-26-146-2346
endword bruksamenes 12-13-26-146-2346-234
endword bruksamere 12-13-26-146-12356
endword bruksameres 12-13-26-146-12356-234
endword bruksames 12-13-26-146-234
endword desam 1456-25-146
endword desamt 1456-25-146-2345
endword desamar 1456-25-146-3456
endword desamars 1456-25-146-3456-234
endword desamen 1456-25-146-126
endword desamens 1456-25-146-126-234
endword desamer 1456-25-146-156
endword desamers 1456-25-146-156-234
endword desamet 1456-25-146-346
endword desamets 1456-25-146-346-234
endword desamne 1456-25-146-2346
endword desamnes 1456-25-146-2346-234
endword desamte 1456-25-146-1256
endword desamtes 1456-25-146-1256-234
endword desamre 1456-25-146-12356
endword desamres 1456-25-146-12356-234
endword desame 1456-26-146
endword desamene 1456-26-146-2346
endword desamenes 1456-26-146-2346-234
endword desamere 1456-26-146-12356
endword desameres 1456-26-146-12356-234
endword desames 1456-26-146-234
endword etsam 346-25-146
endword etsamt 346-25-146-2345
endword etsamar 346-25-146-3456
endword etsamars 346-25-146-3456-234
endword etsamen 346-25-146-126
endword etsamens 346-25-146-126-234
endword etsamer 346-25-146-156
endword etsamers 346-25-146-156-234
endword etsamet 346-25-146-346
endword etsamets 346-25-146-346-234
endword etsamne 346-25-146-2346
endword etsamnes 346-25-146-2346-234
endword etsamte 346-25-146-1256
endword etsamtes 346-25-146-1256-234
endword etsamre 346-25-146-12356
endword etsamres 346-25-146-12356-234
endword etsame 346-26-146
endword etsamene 346-26-146-2346
endword etsamenes 346-26-146-2346-234
endword etsamere 346-26-146-12356
endword etsameres 346-26-146-12356-234
endword etsames 346-26-146-234
endword forsam 1246-25-146
endword forsamt 1246-25-146-2345
endword forsamar 1246-25-146-3456
endword forsamars 1246-25-146-3456-234
endword forsamen 1246-25-146-126
endword forsamens 1246-25-146-126-234
endword forsamer 1246-25-146-156
endword forsamers 1246-25-146-156-234
endword forsamet 1246-25-146-346
endword forsamets 1246-25-146-346-234
endword forsamne 1246-25-146-2346
endword forsamnes 1246-25-146-2346-234
endword forsamte 1246-25-146-1256
endword forsamtes 1246-25-146-1256-234
endword forsamre 1246-25-146-12356
endword forsamres 1246-25-146-12356-234
endword forsame 1246-26-146
endword forsamene 1246-26-146-2346
endword forsamenes 1246-26-146-2346-234
endword forsamere 1246-26-146-12356
endword forsameres 1246-26-146-12356-234
endword forsames 1246-26-146-234
endword medsam 146-25-146
endword medsamt 146-25-146-2345
endword medsamar 146-25-146-3456
endword medsamars 146-25-146-3456-234
endword medsamen 146-25-146-126
endword medsamens 146-25-146-126-234
endword medsamer 146-25-146-156
endword medsamers 146-25-146-156-234
endword medsamet 146-25-146-346
endword medsamets 146-25-146-346-234
endword medsamne 146-25-146-2346
endword medsamnes 146-25-146-2346-234
endword medsamte 146-25-146-1256
endword medsamtes 146-25-146-1256-234
endword medsamre 146-25-146-12356
endword medsamres 146-25-146-12356-234
endword medsame 146-26-146
endword medsamene 146-26-146-2346
endword medsamenes 146-26-146-2346-234
endword medsamere 146-26-146-12356
endword medsameres 146-26-146-12356-234
endword medsames 146-26-146-234
endword nesam 2346-25-146
endword nesamt 2346-25-146-2345
endword nesamar 2346-25-146-3456
endword nesamars 2346-25-146-3456-234
endword nesamen 2346-25-146-126
endword nesamens 2346-25-146-126-234
endword nesamer 2346-25-146-156
endword nesamers 2346-25-146-156-234
endword nesamet 2346-25-146-346
endword nesamets 2346-25-146-346-234
endword nesamne 2346-25-146-2346
endword nesamnes 2346-25-146-2346-234
endword nesamte 2346-25-146-1256
endword nesamtes 2346-25-146-1256-234
endword nesamre 2346-25-146-12356
endword nesamres 2346-25-146-12356-234
endword nesame 2346-26-146
endword nesamene 2346-26-146-2346
endword nesamenes 2346-26-146-2346-234
endword nesamere 2346-26-146-12356
endword nesameres 2346-26-146-12356-234
endword nesames 2346-26-146-234
endword resam 12356-25-146
endword resamt 12356-25-146-2345
endword resamar 12356-25-146-3456
endword resamars 12356-25-146-3456-234
endword resamen 12356-25-146-126
endword resamens 12356-25-146-126-234
endword resamer 12356-25-146-156
endword resamers 12356-25-146-156-234
endword resamet 12356-25-146-346
endword resamets 12356-25-146-346-234
endword resamne 12356-25-146-2346
endword resamnes 12356-25-146-2346-234
endword resamte 12356-25-146-1256
endword resamtes 12356-25-146-1256-234
endword resamre 12356-25-146-12356
endword resamres 12356-25-146-12356-234
endword resame 12356-26-146
endword resamene 12356-26-146-2346
endword resamenes 12356-26-146-2346-234
endword resamere 12356-26-146-12356
endword resameres 12356-26-146-12356-234
endword resames 12356-26-146-234
endword sksam 1256-25-146
endword sksamt 1256-25-146-2345
endword sksamar 1256-25-146-3456
endword sksamars 1256-25-146-3456-234
endword sksamen 1256-25-146-126
endword sksamens 1256-25-146-126-234
endword sksamer 1256-25-146-156
endword sksamers 1256-25-146-156-234
endword sksamet 1256-25-146-346
endword sksamets 1256-25-146-346-234
endword sksamne 1256-25-146-2346
endword sksamnes 1256-25-146-2346-234
endword sksamte 1256-25-146-1256
endword sksamtes 1256-25-146-1256-234
endword sksamre 1256-25-146-12356
endword sksamres 1256-25-146-12356-234
endword sksame 1256-26-146
endword sksamene 1256-26-146-2346
endword sksamenes 1256-26-146-2346-234
endword sksamere 1256-26-146-12356
endword sksameres 1256-26-146-12356-234
endword sksames 1256-26-146-234
endword tesam 1256-25-146
endword tesamt 1256-25-146-2345
endword tesamar 1256-25-146-3456
endword tesamars 1256-25-146-3456-234
endword tesamen 1256-25-146-126
endword tesamens 1256-25-146-126-234
endword tesamer 1256-25-146-156
endword tesamers 1256-25-146-156-234
endword tesamet 1256-25-146-346
endword tesamets 1256-25-146-346-234
endword tesamne 1256-25-146-2346
endword tesamnes 1256-25-146-2346-234
endword tesamte 1256-25-146-1256
endword tesamtes 1256-25-146-1256-234
endword tesamre 1256-25-146-12356
endword tesamres 1256-25-146-12356-234
endword tesame 1256-26-146
endword tesamene 1256-26-146-2346
endword tesamenes 1256-26-146-2346-234
endword tesamere 1256-26-146-12356
endword tesameres 1256-26-146-12356-234
endword tesames 1256-26-146-234

begword sannsyn 234-234									# level 3 contractions
begword usannsyn 136-234-234
begword sannsynleg 234-234-25-1245
begword usannsynleg 136-234-234-25-1245
begword sannsynlig 234-234-25-123
begword usannsynlig 136-234-234-25-123
word sannsynligvis 234-234-1236					# level 3 contractions

word sidan 234-145											# level 3 contractions
word simpelthen 234-1234-125

word sjeldan 234-245-145								# level 3 contractions
word sjelden 234-245-145-126
begword sjelden 234-245-145-126
word sjeldne 234-245-145-2346

midendword sjon 25-1345
endword sjone 26-1345
endword sjonene 26-1345-2346
endword sjonenes 26-1345-2346-234
endword sjonere 26-1345-12356
endword sjoneres 26-1345-12356-234
midendword arsjon 3456-25-1345
endword arsjone 3456-26-1345
endword arsjonene 3456-26-1345-2346
endword arsjonenes 3456-26-1345-2346-234
endword arsjonere 3456-26-1345-12356
endword arsjoneres 3456-26-1345-12356-234
midendword etsjon 346-25-1345
endword etsjone 346-26-1345
endword etsjonene 346-26-1345-2346
endword etsjonenes 346-26-1345-2346-234
endword etsjonere 346-26-1345-12356
endword etsjoneres 346-26-1345-12356-234
midendword nesjon 2346-25-1345
endword nesjone 2346-26-1345
endword nesjonene 2346-26-1345-2346
endword nesjonenes 2346-26-1345-2346-234
endword nesjonere 2346-26-1345-12356
endword nesjoneres 2346-26-1345-12356-234
midendword tesjon 1256-25-1345
endword tesjone 1256-26-1345
endword tesjonene 1256-26-1345-2346
endword tesjonenes 1256-26-1345-2346-234
endword tesjonere 1256-26-1345-12356
endword tesjoneres 1256-26-1345-12356-234
midendword resjon 12356-25-1345
endword resjone 12356-26-1345
endword resjonene 12356-26-1345-2346
endword resjonenes 12356-26-1345-2346-234
endword resjonere 12356-26-1345-12356
endword resjoneres 12356-26-1345-12356-234

begword sk 2356
endword sk 2356
endword ska 2356-1
endword skane 2356-1-2346
endword skas 2356-1-234
endword ske 2356-15
endword skes 2356-15-234
endword skene 2356-15-2346
endword skenes 2356-15-2346-234
endword skt 2356-2345
endword sken 2356-126
endword skens 2356-126-234
endword sker 2356-156
endword skers 2356-156-234
endword sket 2356-346
endword skets 2356-346-234
endword skar 2356-3456
endword skars 2356-3456-234
